test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_solla_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - sollâ:
    sollâ+N+Sg+Nom: sollâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Gen: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Acc: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Ill: soolân
    sollâ+N+Sg+Loc: soolâst
    sollâ+N+Sg+Com: sooláin
    sollâ+N+Sg+Abe: solâttáá
    sollâ+N+Ess: sollân
    sollâ+N+Par: sollâd
    sollâ+N+Pl+Nom: soolah
    sollâ+N+Pl+Gen: [soolâi, solâi]
    sollâ+N+Pl+Acc: soolâid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Ill: sooláid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Loc: soolâin
    sollâ+N+Pl+Com: [solâiguin, solâigijn]
    sollâ+N+Pl+Abe: solâittáá

  Noun - tullâ:
    tullâ+N+Sg+Nom: tullâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuulâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Acc: tuulâ
    tullâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuulân
    tullâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuulâst
    tullâ+N+Sg+Com: tuuláin
    tullâ+N+Sg+Abe: tulâttáá
    tullâ+N+Ess: tullân
    tullâ+N+Par: tullâd
    tullâ+N+Pl+Nom: tuulah
    tullâ+N+Pl+Gen: [tuulâi, tulâi]
    tullâ+N+Pl+Acc: tuulâid
    tullâ+N+Pl+Ill: tuuláid
    tullâ+N+Pl+Loc: tuulâin
    tullâ+N+Pl+Com: [tulâiguin, tulâigijn]
    tullâ+N+Pl+Abe: tulâittáá

  Noun - kunnâ:
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Nom: kunnâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuunâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuunâ
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuunân
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuunâst
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Com: kuunáin
    kunnâ+N+Sg+Abe: kunâttáá
    kunnâ+N+Ess: kunnân
    kunnâ+N+Par: kunnâd
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuunah
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuunâi, kunâi]
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuunâid
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuunáid
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuunâin
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Com: [kunâiguin, kunâigijn]
    kunnâ+N+Pl+Abe: kunâittáá

  Noun - korrâ:
    korrâ+N+Sg+Nom: korrâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Gen: koorâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Acc: koorâ
    korrâ+N+Sg+Ill: koorân
    korrâ+N+Sg+Loc: koorâst
    korrâ+N+Sg+Com: kooráin
    korrâ+N+Sg+Abe: korâttáá
    korrâ+N+Ess: korrân
    korrâ+N+Par: korrâd
    korrâ+N+Pl+Nom: koorah
    korrâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koorâi, korâi]
    korrâ+N+Pl+Acc: koorâid
    korrâ+N+Pl+Ill: kooráid
    korrâ+N+Pl+Loc: koorâin
    korrâ+N+Pl+Com: [korâiguin, korâigijn]
    korrâ+N+Pl+Abe: korâittáá

  Noun - čiŋŋâ:
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: čiŋŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: čiiŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: čiiŋâ
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: čiiŋân
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: čiiŋâst
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: čiiŋáin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: čiŋâttáá
    čiŋŋâ+N+Ess: čiŋŋân
    čiŋŋâ+N+Par: čiŋŋâd
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: čiiŋah
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [čiiŋâi, čiŋâi]
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: čiiŋâid
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: čiiŋáid
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: čiiŋâin
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: [čiŋâiguin, čiŋâigijn]
    čiŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: čiŋâittáá

  Noun - juŋŋâ:
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: juŋŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: juuŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: juuŋâ
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: juuŋân
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: juuŋâst
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: juuŋáin
    juŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: juŋâttáá
    juŋŋâ+N+Ess: juŋŋân
    juŋŋâ+N+Par: juŋŋâd
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: juuŋah
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [juuŋâi, juŋâi]
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: juuŋâid
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: juuŋáid
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: juuŋâin
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: [juŋâiguin, juŋâigijn]
    juŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: juŋâittáá

  Noun - šoŋŋâ: #SOLLA
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: šoŋŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: šooŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: šooŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: šooŋân
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: šooŋâst
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: šooŋáin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: šoŋâttáá
    šoŋŋâ+N+Ess:    šoŋŋân
    šoŋŋâ+N+Par:    šoŋŋâd
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: šooŋah
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [šooŋâi, šoŋâi] 
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: šooŋâid
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: šooŋáid
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: šooŋâin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: [šoŋâiguin, šoŋâigijn]
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: šoŋâittáá

  Noun - kurrâ: # 2B SOLLA
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Nom: kurrâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuurâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuurâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuurân
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuurâst
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Com: kuuráin
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Abe: kurâttáá
    kurrâ+N+Ess:  kurrân
    kurrâ+N+Par:   kurrâd
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuurah
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuurâi, kurâi]
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuurâid
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuuráid
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuurâin
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Com: [kurâiguin, kurâigijn]
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Abe: kurâittáá

  Noun - ruttâ:
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruttâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruuđâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruuđâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruutân
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruuđâst
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Com: ruuđáin
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruđâttáá
    ruttâ+N+Ess:    ruttân
    ruttâ+N+Par:    ruttâd
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruuđah
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ruuđâi, ruđâi] 
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruuđâid
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruuđáid
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruuđâin
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Com: [ruđâiguin, ruđâigijn]
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruđâittáá

  Noun - vuojâ:
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Nom: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Gen: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Acc: vuojâ
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Ill: vuojân
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Loc: vuojâst
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Com: vuojáin
    vuojâ+N+Sg+Abe: vuojâttáá
    vuojâ+N+Ess: vuoijân
    vuojâ+N+Par: vuoijâd
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Nom: vuojah
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Gen: vuojâi
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Acc: vuojâid
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Ill: vuojáid 
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Loc: vuojâin
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Com: [vuojâiguin, vuojâigijn]
    vuojâ+N+Pl+Abe: vuojâittáá

  Noun - luččâ:
    luččâ+N+Sg+Nom: luččâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Gen: luujâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Acc: luujâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Ill: luučân
    luččâ+N+Sg+Loc: luujâst
    luččâ+N+Sg+Com: luujáin
    luččâ+N+Sg+Abe: lujâttáá
    luččâ+N+Ess: luččân
    luččâ+N+Par: luččâd
    luččâ+N+Pl+Nom: luujah
    luččâ+N+Pl+Gen: [luujâi, lujâi]
    luččâ+N+Pl+Acc: luujâid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Ill: luujáid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Loc: luujâin
    luččâ+N+Pl+Com: [lujâiguin, lujâigijn]
    luččâ+N+Pl+Abe: lujâittáá
